District of Columbia statutes.
50-2608

Appropriations; employment of director; salaries of members of agency.

The Mayor shall include in his annual budget such amounts as may be required from the highway fund established in § 47-2301 for the purpose of carrying out the provisions of this subchapter.

History

Feb. 16, 1942, 56 Stat. 93, ch. 76, § 8
Oct. 28, 1949, 63 Stat. 992, title XI, ch. 782, § 1106(a)
Mar. 2, 1962, 76 Stat. 18, Pub. L. 87-408, § 602
Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-139, § 3205(n), 25 DCR 5740
Sept. 26, 1980, D.C. Law 3-108, § 3(a), 27 DCR 3781
Nov. 16, 2006, D.C. Law 16-175, § 4(f), 53 DCR 6499

Section References

This section is referenced in § 1-636.02.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 40-810.
1973 Ed., § 40-809.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 16-175 rewrote the section which had read as follows: “The Mayor shall include in his annual budget such amounts as may be required from the highway fund established in § 47-2301, for the purpose of carrying out the provisions of this subchapter. The Mayor is authorized to employ a director and such other personal services as may be necessary to carry out the provisions of this subchapter. The Mayor shall fix the compensation of the members of said Agency without reference to the provisions of the Classification Act of 1923; provided, however, that the compensation of any members shall not exceed $500 per annum; and provided further, that no compensation for services as a member of such agency shall be provided for any member who holds a salaried public office or position, in the District of Columbia or the federal government.”